DI-25

DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM
CIRCUIT INSPECTION '
DTC |co200/3 1t0oC0215/34 Speed SensorCircuit
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
o The speed sensor detects wheel speed and sends the ap-

+V

Speed Sensor

Low Speed

High Speed

propriate signals to the ECU. These signals are used for control
ofboththe ABS & BA & TRC & VSC control system. The front

and rear rotors each have 48 serrations.
Whentherotors rotate, the magnetic field emitted by the perma-
nent magnet in the speed sensor generates an AC voltage.
Since the frequency of this AC voltage changes in direct propor-
tion to the speed of the rotor, the frequency is used by the ECU
to detect the speed of each wheel.

BR3sgs  —V
BR3582 F00010
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
Detectionofany ofconditions  1.through4.:
1.Atvehiclespeedof 10km/h (6 mph) ormore, pulsesare
notinputfor 15sec.
C0200/3 1 2.Momentary interruption of the speed sensor signal oc-
y . P . . P . g. « Rightfront, left front, rightrear and leftrear speed sensor
C0205/32 cursatleast 7 timesinthetime between switchingthe A
L . . * Each speed sensor circuit
C0210/33 ignition switch ON and switchingit OFF. Sensorrotor
C0215/3 4 3. Continuous noise occurs into the speed sensor signals
with the vehicle speed at20 km/h ( 12mph) ormore.
4. The condition that the speed sensor signal circuit is
opencontinuesfor0. 12sec.ormore.
HINT:

DTCNo.C0200/3

1 isfortherightfrontspeed sensor.

DTC No. C0205 / 32 is for the left front speed sensor.
DTCNo.C02 10/33isfortherightrearspeedsensor.
DTCNo.C02 15/34isfortheleftrear speedsensor.
Fail safe function:

If trouble occurs in the speed sensor circuit, the ECU cuts off current to the ABS solenoid relay and prohibits
ABS & BA & TRC & VSC controls and the brake system becomes normal.
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DI-26 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

WIRING DIAGRAM
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DI-27

ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU

ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &

BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DIAGNOSTICS
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RHD:

+ | n + | + | n + |
— n [ang 1 — (7)) oc o
T o T T m T T i o o
Al Al Al (3] (3] (s0) (32} (32] [s9)
((e] (ep] o —
°g 2@ 2@ = =@ =@ = @ =@ @
o -
I —_ [ —
= m"--- I = A N "m
I | —_—
= © @ G ! © ! m zZ o
o F m =4 e o B
A B bl iiuiaduial i 2t At Mty = -~~~ *--- - m ~
1 | | I 1 .
_ _ _ | | _
! o ! N N < NA N
| 89 | o T s T s B S s I s N e
! | | _ -la| & «|a ola| ola| 2z
“ | | m ! _
I ] ] I
1 | | ! — ! 1 —
" _ _ S - S S SRR SR IS 3
“ _ L o : 2 @ O | ! : 'S
I | £ e -
“ | " I (2K ! “ ' N7
I | | [ i plaa s Rt ! | B il s el ~
! | 1 _) 1
" 1 ! "d _
_ “ “ _% N N ! N N
1 | | _Mw Al [aN] Al (aV] Al
! _ ! L= 3% [} SW <O 8%
! | I 7)) a1} m
llllllllllllll [ E R P —
m_ llllllllllllllll cl @ -1 --- _m
D | o0 I K]
o k=]
° 0] “ | m = )
5! " | =
~t-—-—-F-—-—-=-=-=-=-=-=-= *-—-——-———@®-—-——-—--- - - -——-—--FF-—-———-=-9-=-=-- ~
QY < — o
N N N N
™ ™ [s2]
|\ddd./l |§d)l
o O] m =
ko] S — © mm mw 5 —
0 ? e g2 @ A 2 o
%936 290 5 @ L O 55
JwL oy Cwowmawm MW MW ) C mm 195) C
o o) ©
o Ly e 9 Ly
B2 S Q2 &

F10009

1E)

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM73




DI-28 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:
Starttheinspectionfromstep 1 incaseofusingthehand -heldtesterand startfromstep2incase of not
usingthehand -heldtester.

1 Checkoutput value of speed sensor.

PREPARATION:

(a) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.

(b) Turntheignition switch ON and push the hand -heldtester main switch ON.
(c) Selectthe DATALIST mode onthe hand -heldtester.

CHECK:

Check that there is no difference between the speed value output from the speed sensor displayed on the
hand-heldtesterandthe speedvalue displayed onthe speedometer when driving the vehicle.
OK:
There is almost no difference from the displayed speed value.
HINT:
Thereistoleranceof + 10% inthe speedometerindication.

@

2 | Check speed sensor.

OK> Check andreplace ABS & BA & TRC & VSCECU.

Front:
PREPARATION:
(a) Make surethatthereis nolooseness atthe connector
lock part and connecting part of the connector.
(b) Disconnect speed sensor connector.
CHECK:
. LH side:
Measure resistance between terminals 2 and 4 of speed
sensor connector.
. RHside:
Measure resistance betweenterminals 1 and2ofspeed
sensor connector.

OK:
Fo4508 Resistance:0.92 - 1.22k Q
CHECK:
. LH side:

Measure resistance between terminals 2 and 4 of speed
sensor connector and body ground.

. RH side:
Measure resistance betweenterminals 1 and2ofspeed
sensor connector and body ground.
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-29

BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

®LOCK
5 N 1 2 ﬁ]’ 1

F02833

OK:
Resistance: 1 MQ or higher
Rear:
PREPARATION:
(a) Make sure that there is no looseness at the connector
lock part and connecting part of the connector.
(b) Disconnect speed sensor connector.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals 1 and 2 of speed sensor
connector.
OK:
Resistance: 1.0 - 1.4 kQ
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminal 1 or 2 of speed sensor
connector and body ground.
OK:
Resistance: 1 MQ or higher

NG> Replace speed sensor.

NOTICE:
Check the speed sensor signal last (See page DI-4).

3 [ Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between each speed
sensor and ECU (See page IN-35).
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NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &

BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

4 Check sensor installation.

o T

17
T

K

BR3795

3

CHECK:

Check the speed sensor installation.

OK:
The installation bolt is tightened properly and there is
no clearance between the sensor and front steering
knuckle or rear axle shaft.

NG> Replace speed sensor.

NOTICE:
Check the speed sensor signal last (See page DI-4).

5 [ Check speed sensor and sensor rotor serrations.

AWATAWA
VAVRTAVA

2 m/s / Division
1V / Division W04200
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(REFERENCE) INSPECTION USING OSCILLOSCOPE

PREPARATION:

(@) Remove the ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU.

(b) Connect the oscilloscope to the each of terminals FR+,
FL+, RR+or RL+and GND ofthe ABS & BA& TRC & VSC
ECU.

CHECK:

Drive the vehicle at about 20 km/h (12 mph), and check the sig-

nal waveform.

OK> Checkandreplace ABS & BA & TRC & VSCECU.




DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-31

BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

6 [ Check sensor rotor and sensor tip.

RO7880

F04443

OK

Front:
PREPARATION:
Remove front axle hub (See Pub No. RM616E on page SA-21).
CHECK:
Check the sensor rotor serrations.
OK:
No scratches, missing teeth or foreign objects.
PREPARATION:
Remove front speed sensor (See Pub No. RM616E on page
BR-89).
CHECK:
Check the sensor tip.
OK:
No scratches or foreign objects on the sensor tip.

Rear:
PREPARATION:
Remove the rear axle shaft (See Pub No. RM616E on page
SA-161).
CHECK:
Check the sensor rotor serrations.
OK:
No scratches, missing teeth or foreign objects.
PREPARATION:
Remove rear speed sensor (See Pub No. RM616E on page
BR-92).
CHECK:
Check the sensor tip.
OK:
No scratches or foreign objects on the sensor tip.

NG> Replace speed sensor or rotor.

NOTICE:
Check the speed sensor signal last (See page DI-4).

Check and replace ABS & BA & TRC & VSC

ECU.
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